Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,216
Snowmobiles; reciprocity; when.

Snowmobiles properly registered in another state shall be allowed to operate in the State of Nebraska on a reciprocal basis.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 216.